California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 563.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

7904.

Every agent, operator, or employee of any telegraph or telephone office, who wilfully refuses or neglects to send any message received at such office for transmission, or wilfully postpones the transmission of the message out of its order, or wilfully refuses or neglects to deliver any message received by telegraph or telephone, is guilty of a misdemeanor. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any message to be received, transmitted or delivered, unless the charges thereon have been paid or tendered, nor to require the sending, receiving, or delivery of any message counseling, aiding, abetting, or encouraging treason against the Government of the United
 States or of this State, or other resistance to the lawful authority, or any message calculated to further any fraudulent plan or purpose, or to instigate or encourage the perpetration of any unlawful act, or to facilitate the escape of any criminal or person accused of crime.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7905.

The Public Utilities Commission shall issue regulations requiring every telephone corporation subject to its jurisdiction to maintain complete records of all instances in which its employees discover any device installed for the purpose of overhearing communications over the lines of such corporation and all instances in which such employees reasonably believe and report to the corporation their belief that such device is installed or has been installed but has since been removed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

7906.

The Public Utilities Commission shall regularly make inquiry of every telephone corporation under its jurisdiction to determine whether or not such corporation is taking adequate steps to insure the privacy of communications over such corporation’s telephone communication system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

7910.

(a) Telephone corporations, holders of a state franchise pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 5800), and a video provider, as defined in Section 53088.1 of the Government Code, shall perform background checks of applicants for employment, according to usual business practices.

(b) A background check equivalent to that performed by the contracting telephone corporation, a holder of a state franchise pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 5800), and a video
 provider, as defined in Section 53088.1 of the Government Code, shall also be conducted on all of the following:

(1) Persons hired by a contracting entity under a personal services contract.

(2) Independent contractors and their employees.

(3) Vendors and their employees.

(c) Independent contractors and vendors shall certify that they have obtained the background checks required pursuant to subdivision (b), and shall make the background checks available to the contracting entity upon request.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by contract, the telephone corporation, a holder of a state franchise pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 5800), and a video provider, as defined in
 Section 53088.1 of the Government Code, shall not be responsible for administering the background checks and shall not assume the cost of the background checks of individuals who are not applicants for employment of the contracting entity.

(e) (1) An individual shall not, on behalf of a telephone corporation, holder of a state franchise pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 5800), or video provider, as defined in Section 53088.1 of the Government Code, enter upon the premises of any individual unless he or she has had the background check required by subdivisions (a) and (b).

(2) Subdivision (a) applies to applicants for employment for positions that would allow the applicant to have direct contact with or access to the company’s network or central office and would require the applicant to perform activities that involve the installation, service,
 or repair of the company’s network or equipment.

(3) Subdivision (b) applies to any person that has direct contact with or access to the company’s network or central office and performs activities that involve the installation, service, or repair of the company’s network or equipment.

(f) This section does not apply to temporary workers performing emergency functions to restore the network of a telephone corporation to its normal state in the event of a natural disaster or an emergency that threatens or results in the loss of service.

(g) The provisions of this section apply only to applicants for employment who apply for employment on and after January 1, 2009, and to contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

7912.

A public utility employing more than 750 total employees shall annually report to the commission all of the following:

(a) The number of customers served in California by the public utility.

(b) The percentage of the public utility’s total domestic customer base that resides in California.

(c) The number of California residents employed by the public utility, calculated on a full-time or full-time equivalent basis.

(d) The percentage of the public utility’s total domestic workforce, calculated on a full-time or
 full-time equivalent basis, that resides in California.

(e) The capital investment in the public utility’s tangible and intangible plant which ordinarily have a service life of more than one year, including plant used by the company or others in providing public utility services, in California during the yearly reporting period.

(f) The number of California residents employed by independent contractors and consultants hired by the public utility, calculated on a full-time or full-time equivalent basis, when the public utility has obtained this information upon requesting it from the independent contractor or consultant, and the public utility is not contractually prohibited from disclosing the information to the public. This subdivision is inapplicable to contractors and consultants that are a public utility subject to the reporting requirements of this section. This paragraph
 applies only to those employees of an independent contractor or consultant that are personally providing services to the public utility, and does not apply to employees of an independent contractor or consultant not personally performing services for the public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 69.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. New Area Codes [7930. - 7943.]

7930.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The explosive demand for new area codes in California requires more area codes to be established than was envisioned when this chapter and Section 2887 were enacted in 1990.

(b) Because of the advent of competition in the local telecommunications market, and a decision by the Federal Communications Commission, new area codes are established by the North American Numbering Plan
 Administrator in conjunction with the commission and members of the telecommunications industry.

(c) In order to eliminate potential confusion for all the parties involved in the process of establishing new area codes, the changes to this chapter enacted in the 1997–98 Regular Session include identifying “providers” in Section 7931.

(d) The “providers” specified in Section 7931 include telephone corporations and resellers that are regulated by the commission, and paging companies that are not regulated by the commission. It is necessary to include all of these entities within the term “providers” in order to effectively meet the needs of the state as they relate to the establishment of new area codes. The Legislature does not, however, by including paging companies as “providers” in Section 7931, intend to expand the jurisdiction of the commission over paging companies beyond the
 requirements of this chapter. The Legislature continues to recognize the status of paging companies as unregulated entities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 534, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7931.

(a) This chapter is applicable to telephone corporations, including resellers, and to paging companies, hereafter referred to as providers.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “coordinator” means the “coordinator for California area code relief” as designated by the North American Numbering Council.

(c) Whenever the coordinator and providers evaluate the potential boundaries of a new area code, they shall consider rate area boundaries, municipal boundaries, communities of interest, and other appropriate criteria.

(d) When
 the coordinator determines the need to establish a new area code, at least 30 months prior to the projected opening of the new area code, the coordinator shall provide written notice to the commission regarding the need to establish the new area code.

(e) From the date the written notice required by subdivision (d) is received by the commission all of the following shall be done:

(1) Within three months all providers shall notify all affected customers in writing of the need to establish a new area code. Nothing in this paragraph requires a customer to receive in one bill more than one notice for each billed number.

(2) Within nine months the coordinator and the commission staff shall notify representatives of local
 jurisdictions and the public in affected geographic areas, and, at the discretion of the
 commission, may conduct one or more meetings both for representatives of local jurisdictions and for members of the public in affected geographic areas to inform them of the proposed area code relief options and of measures that may be taken to mitigate any potential disruptions, and to afford them the opportunity to discuss the potential impact of the proposed options.

(3) Within 11 months the coordinator shall file the results of the area code relief planning process with the commission requesting commission approval to implement a plan. Anyone may contest the results of the area code planning process by filing a written protest with the commission not later than 60 days after the results have been filed with the commission.

(f) Unless the commission determines otherwise,
 at least 12 months prior to the date adopted by the commission for opening the new area code, all of the following shall be done:

(1) The coordinator shall notify the general public of the specific geographic area to be included in both the old and new area codes. The notice shall include the schedule for any transitional dialing periods required by Section 7932.

(2) Each telephone provider serving the specific geographic area included in the existing area code shall give written notice to all its affected customers about the specific geographic area that will be included in the new area code. The notice shall include the schedule for any transitional dialing periods required by Section 7932, and the prefixes that will be contained in the new area code. Nothing in this paragraph
 requires a customer to receive in one bill more than one notice for each billed telephone number.

(g) Within three months prior to the adopted date for opening the new area code, each provider serving the existing area code shall give written notice to its affected customers of the specific geographic boundaries of the new area code. The notice shall include the schedule for any transitional periods required by Section 7932, and the prefixes that will be contained in the new area code. Nothing in this paragraph requires a customer to receive in one bill more than one notice for each billed number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 425, Sec. 13.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7932.

(a) Whenever a provider opens a new area code, it shall do all of the following:

(1) If the new area code plan permits seven-digit dialing, provide for a transitional dialing period during which a number in the new area code, or a number in the existing area code, may be reached by dialing either the seven-digit called number, or the area code plus the seven-digit called number.

(2) Subsequent to the
 transitional dialing period provided in paragraph (1), if prefix codes are available, permit callers to reach a recorded announcement, without charge, that will inform the caller of the new area code when the existing area code is dialed.

(3) If the new area code plan requires 10-digit dialing within an area code, provide for any transitional dialing period or recorded announcements the commission may order.

(b) Paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall no longer be operative if an authorized federal or state agency orders mandatory 10-digit dialing.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7931 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 534, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7933.

The rate structure of any call originating in or made to an area code shall not change with the split of an area code into two or more area codes, regardless of the number of digits dialed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7932 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 534, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7934.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The number of area codes in this state has more than doubled since 1991.

(b) The proliferation of area codes has caused undue hardship on citizens of this state, who have begun to be forced into new area codes after years of having the same telephone number.

(c) That proliferation has substantially increased costs
 to businesses, individuals, and government agencies.

(d) New area codes require the replacement of business cards and letterhead stationery, and companies must use employee time contacting their customers to ensure that those customers are able to continue to reach the affected company.

(e) The proliferation of area codes has also reduced worker productivity as employees begin using new and unfamiliar area codes.

(f) It is the policy of the Legislature that existing area codes should be preserved for as long as possible.

(g) It is the further policy of the Legislature that the hardship currently experienced by telecommunications customers as a result of the creation of new area codes should be alleviated.

(h) For all of the reasons stated above, it is necessary for the commission, as a public agency, to take all possible measures to protect area codes as a public resource, stop area code proliferation, and review their existing practice of establishing new area code regions and the creation of area code overlays.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 809, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7935.

(a) The commission shall develop and implement any measures it determines to be available for telephone corporations that possess prefixes to efficiently allocate telephone numbers within those prefixes. The commission shall consider the cost effectiveness of these measures before requiring implementation. Among the measures the commission shall consider are rate center consolidation, allocation of numbers in blocks smaller than 10,000, and unassigned number porting.

(b) For the
 purpose of this section, in accordance with the North American Numbering Plan, a telephone number consists of a three digit area code or number plan area (NPA), a three digit prefix or NXX code, and a four digit line number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 809, Sec. 3.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7936.

The commission shall direct the North American Numbering Plan Administrator to obtain utilization data for any area code for which a relief plan is proposed, prior to adopting a plan for, or setting a date for, relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 809, Sec. 4.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7938.

The commission shall require, as an interim measure until the commission develops procedures for number pooling or adopts utilization standards, that number assignments made by telephone corporations to their customers shall be made first from prefixes that are more than 25 percent in use. A telephone corporation may assign numbers from prefixes with less than 25 percent use only to the extent necessary, if numbers from prefixes that are more than 25 percent in use are not otherwise available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 809, Sec. 6.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7939.

(a) If the commission or an authorized federal agency establishes a process to ensure that telephone numbers can be allocated in blocks smaller than 10,000, the commission shall require that a telephone corporation return to the North American Numbering Plan Administrator blocks of telephone numbers for reassignment, in a quantity determined by the commission.

(b) The commission shall direct the North American Numbering Plan Administrator to seek the return of blocks of numbers
 smaller than 10,000 not in use. The commission, for purposes of this section, shall define “not in use.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 809, Sec. 7.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7940.

A telephone corporation doing business in this state that possesses one or more telephone number prefixes, or portions thereof, shall provide to the commission or its agent, upon request, use information pertaining to both those prefixes in use and those prefixes not in use, according to any schedule established by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 809, Sec. 8.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7943.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that when the commission has no reasonable alternative other than to create a new area code, that the commission do so in a way that creates the least inconvenience for customers.

(b) The commission shall request that the Federal Communications Commission grant authority for the commission to order telephone corporations to assign telephone numbers dedicated to mobile telephony service and mobile data service, as defined in Section 224.4,
 to a separate area code and to permit seven digit dialing within that technology-specific area code and the underlying preexisting area code or codes.

(c) Before approving any new area code, the commission shall first perform a telephone utilization study and implement all reasonable telephone number conservation measures.

(d) If the commission receives the grant of authority set forth in subdivision (b) and determines that further area code relief is needed, the commission shall exercise the authority granted to it in subdivision (b) unless it finds at least one of the following:

(1) Exercising the authority granted by subdivision (b) would be more disruptive to the customers where area code relief has been determined to be necessary.

(2) Exercising
 the authority granted by subdivision (b) will not adequately extend the life of the area code where relief has been determined to be necessary.

(e) The commission may not implement any authority granted by the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to subdivision (b), in a manner that impairs the ability of a customer to have number portability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Injury to Public Utility Property [7951. - 7953.]

7951.

Any person who wilfully and maliciously does any injury to telegraph or telephone or electric power or gas property is liable to the corporation for three times the amount of actual damages sustained thereby, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7952.

Any person who injures or destroys, through want of proper care, any necessary or useful facility or equipment of any telegraph, telephone, electrical, or gas corporation, is liable to the corporation for all damages sustained thereby. The measure of damages to the facility or equipment injured or destroyed shall be the cost to repair or replace the property injured or destroyed including direct and allocated costs for labor, materials, supervision, supplies, tools, taxes, transportation, administrative and general expense and other indirect or overhead expenses, less credit, if any, for salvage, as determined by such telegraph, telephone, electrical or gas corporations in
 conformity with a system of accounts established by the commission. The specifying of the measure of damages for the facility or equipment shall not preclude the recovery of such other damages occasioned thereby as may be authorized by law.

Any vessel which, by dragging its anchor, or otherwise, breaks, injures or destroys any underwater cable of a telegraph, telephone or electrical corporation or pipeline of a gas corporation, subjects its owner to liability for the damages sustained thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

7953.

No telegraph, telephone, electrical or gas corporation can recover damages for the breaking, injury or destruction of any underwater cable or gas pipeline, unless the corporation has previously placed a marker on the bank of the waters under which the cable or pipeline is placed, indicating the place where the cable or pipeline lies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Electrical Line Construction [8001. - 8057.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [8001. - 8003.]

8001.

Unless the particular provisions or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.

“Person” includes any commission, officer, agent, or employee of this State, or of any county, city, city and county, or other political subdivision thereof, and any other person, firm, or corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8003.

“Signal wires or cables” include telephone, telegraph, and other signal wires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Surface Transmission [8026. - 8038.]

8026.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain any wire or cable used to conduct electricity, on any pole, or any crossarm, bracket, or other appliance attached to such pole, within a distance of 13 inches from the center line of the pole.

This section does not apply to signal wires or cables which are attached to a pole to which is attached no wire or cable other than signal wires or cables, except within the corporate limits of a city, nor shall this section apply to such wires or cables where they are placed vertically on poles, nor to bridle or jumper wires on any pole which are attached to signal wires on the same pole, nor
 to any aerial cable, as between such cable and any pole on which it originates or terminates.

Telephone toll lines may be exempt from the provisions of this section if proper evidence introduced before the commission proves to the satisfaction of the commission, that compliance would seriously interfere with long distance telephone transmission.

This section does not apply to wires run from lead wires to arc or incandescent lamps nor to transformers placed upon poles, nor to any wire or cable where it is attached to the top of a pole, as between it and the pole, nor to any aerial cable containing signal wires where the cable is attached to a pole on which no other wires or cables than wires continuing from the cable are maintained if electric light or power wires or cables are not maintained on the same side of the street or highway on which the aerial cable is placed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8027.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain in the vicinity of any pole (and unattached thereto) within the distance of 13 inches from the center line of the pole, any wire or cable used to conduct electricity, or place, erect or maintain any pole (to which is attached any wire or cable used to conduct electricity) within the distance of 13 inches (measured from the center of such pole) from any wire or cable used to conduct or carry electricity. As between any wire or cable and any pole, only the wire, cable, or pole last in point of time run, placed, or erected, shall be held to be run, placed, erected, or maintained in violation of the provisions of this section.

This section does not apply to signal wires, or cables on poles to which are attached no other wires, as between such wires and poles to which are attached no other wires or cables than signal wires if such wires, cables, and poles are not within the corporate limits of a city.

Telephone toll lines may be exempt from this section if proper evidence introduced before the commission proves to the satisfaction of the commission, that compliance would seriously interfere with long distance telephone transmission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8028.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain, above ground, within four feet from any wire or cable conducting less than 600 volts of electricity, any wire or cable which conducts at any one time more than 600 volts of electricity, or run, place, erect, or maintain within four feet from any wire or cable which conducts at any one time more than 600 volts of electricity any wire or cable conducting or carrying less than 600 volts of electricity.

This section does not apply to wires or cables attached to a transformer, arc or incandescent lamp within four feet (measured along the line of the wire or cable) from the point where
 such wire or cable is attached to such transformer, arc or incandescent lamp, nor to wires or cables within buildings or other structures, nor to wires or cables where they are placed vertically on poles, or to any lead wires or cables between the points where they are made to leave any pole for the purpose of entering any building or other structure and the point at which they are made to enter such building or structure.

As between any two wires or cables, or any wire or any cable, run, placed, erected, or maintained in violation of this section, only the wire or cable last in point of time run, placed, or erected shall be held to be run, placed, erected, or maintained thus in violation of this section.

Where no more than one crossarm is maintained on a pole, all the wires or cables conducting at any one time more than 600 volts of electricity shall be placed on the crossarm on one side of the pole, and all the wires or
 cables conducting less than 600 volts of electricity shall be placed on the crossarm on the other side of the pole. The space between any wire or cable conducting at any one time more than 600 volts of electricity and any wire or cable conducting less than that voltage shall be at least 36 inches clear measurement in a horizontal line.

Where the provisions of this section cannot be complied with, the commission may grant permission for the following form of construction; where two or more systems for the distribution of electric light or power occupy the same poles with wires or cables, all wires or cables conducting at any one time more than 600 volts of electricity may be placed on the crossarms on one side of the pole, and all wires or cables conducting less than that voltage, shall in such case, be placed on the crossarms on the other side of the pole; the space between any wire or cable conducting at any one time more than 600 volts of electricity and any wire
 or cable conducting or carrying less than that voltage shall be at least 36 inches in measurement in a horizontal line; and in such construction all crossarms shall be at least 36 inches apart in a vertical line.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8029.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain any wire or cable which conducts at any one time more than 600 volts of electricity, without causing each crossarm, or such other appliance as is used in lieu thereof, to which such wire or cable is attached to be kept at all times painted a bright yellow color, or, on such crossarm, or other appliance used in lieu thereof, shall be placed signs, providing, in white letters on a green background, not less than three (3) inches in height the words “high voltage” on the face and back of each crossarm. The provisions of this section do not apply to crossarms to which are attached wires or cables conducting more than 10,000 volts
 of electricity, and which are situated outside the corporate limits of a city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8029.5.

No person shall place, erect, or maintain on any pole any transformer, capacitor, or other electrical device containing polychlorinated biphenyls for transforming electric current, when the pole or transformer is required to be marked pursuant to applicable regulations of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, unless the person owning or controlling the pole on which the device is situated, upon request of any fire protection agency within the person’s electrical service area, either marks the pole with a reflective band specified by the fire protection agency or furnishes to the fire protection agency the location of every pole within the
 fire protection agency on which such a device is located, at the person’s option.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 549, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8030.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain any guy wire or guy cable attached to any pole or appliance to which is attached any wire or cable used to conduct electricity, without causing the guy wire or guy cable to be effectively insulated at all times at a distance of not less than four (4) feet nor more than eight (8) feet (measured along the line of the wire or cable) from the upper end thereof, and at a point not less than eight (8) feet vertically above the ground from the lower end thereof. Where two or more guy wires or guy cables are attached to the same pole and same anchorage pole there shall be at least one foot, vertical space, between the points of
 attachment. No insulation shall be required at the lower end of a guy wire or guy cable where it is attached to a grounded anchor. Where guy wires or guy cables are attached to a pole or structure of steel or other conducting material supporting wires or cables conducting in excess of 15,000 volts where the pole or structure is thoroughly grounded no insulation shall be required at any point in the guy wire or guy cable.

This section does not apply to guy wires or guy cables attached to poles carrying no wire or cable other than signal wires or cables and which are situated outside the corporate limits of a city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8031.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain vertically on any pole any wire or cable used to conduct electricity, without causing such wire or cable to be at all times wholly incased in a casing equal in durability and insulating efficiency to a wooded casing not less than one and one-half inches thick.

This section does not apply to vertical signal wires or cables on poles where no other such wires or cables are maintained, and which are outside the corporate limits of a city, nor to wires or cables run vertically on iron poles or structures where both pole or structure and conduit are securely grounded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8032.

No person shall place, erect, or maintain on any pole, or any crossarm or other appliance on the pole, which carries or upon which is placed an electric arc lamp, any transformer for transforming electric currents. This section shall not apply if the arc lamp is suspended so that it can be trimmed from the ground or from a stand located on the pole not less than seven feet below the transformer, and in so suspending the arc lamp no wire or cable in connection therewith is run vertically on the pole unless the wire or cable is protected as provided for in Section 8031.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8033.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain any wire or cable carrying more than 15,000 volts of electricity across any wire or cable carrying less than that voltage or across any public highway, except on a pole of such height and so placed at each crossing that under no circumstances can the wire or cable of a voltage higher than 15,000 volts in case of breakage thereof or otherwise, come in contact with any wire or cable of less than that voltage, or fall within a distance of ten (10) feet from the surface of any public highway; or in lieu thereof double strength construction may be installed, in which case the wires carrying a voltage higher than 15,000 volts shall,
 between the points of crossing, be of a cross-section area equal to at least twice that used in the line outside of such crossing, except where the conductor used is equal to number four (4) stranded Brown and Sharpe gauge or greater, in which case the wires or cables will be considered as complying with the law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8034.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain any suspension wire to which is attached any aerial cable of 75 pair No. 19 Brown and Sharpe gauge or over, or of 100 pair No. 22 Brown and Sharpe gauge or over suspended from a crossarm, or from any other structure or appliance from which the suspension wire is hung, by a single bolt and clamp without at the same time attaching the suspension wire to the crossarms, structure, or appliance by an additional safety bolt and clamp, or other safety appliance for thus attaching the suspension wire of tensile strength equal to the first bolt and clamp.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8035.

None of the provisions of Sections 8026 to 8034, inclusive, apply to direct current electric wires or cables having the same polarity, nor to signal wires when no more than two (2) of such signal wires are attached to any one pole, but no such direct current or signal wires shall in any case be run, placed, erected, or maintained within the distance of thirteen (13) inches from the center line of any pole other than the pole or poles on which the wires or cables are carried, carrying electric wires or cables. As between any two wires, or cables, or any wire or cable run, placed, erected, or maintained in violation of this section, only the wire or cable last in point of
 time run, placed, erected, or maintained shall be held to be run, placed, erected, or maintained thus in violation of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8036.

No person shall run, place, erect, or maintain any span wire attached to any wire or cable used to conduct electricity, without causing the span wire to be at all times effectively insulated between the outer point at which it is in any case fastened to the pole or other structure by which it is hung or supported, and at the point at which it is in any case thus attached. Such insulation shall not in any case be placed less than two (2) feet or more than four (4) feet from the point at which the span wire is so attached. When in any case such span wire is attached along its length to any two (2) such wires or cables, conducting electricity and extending parallel to each
 other, not more than eighteen (18) feet apart, such insulation shall not be required therein at any point between such parallel wires or cables. This section does not apply where feeder wires are used in place of span wires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8037.

The commission may grant such additional time and shall inspect all work which is included in the provisions of this article, and may make such further additions or changes as the commission deems necessary for the purpose of safety to employees and the general public. The commission shall enforce the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8038.

Any violation of any provision of this article is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Underground Transmission [8051. - 8057.]

8051.

No person shall build or rebuild any subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room used or to be used to contain, encase, cover, or conduct any wire, cable, or appliance, to conduct or handle electricity, unless such subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room has an inside measurement of not less than four feet at the maximum points between the side walls thereof, and between the end walls thereof, and not less than five feet at all points between the floor and the top or ceiling thereof, or if circular in shape, at least four feet diameter inside measurement and not less than five feet at all points between the floor and ceiling thereof. This section does not apply to
 any such subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room, within which it is not intended or required that any human being perform work or labor or be employed. This section does not apply where satisfactory proof is submitted to the commission that it is impracticable or physically impossible to comply with this law within the space or location so designated by the proper municipal authorities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8052.

No person shall build or rebuild in any subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room used or to be used to contain, encase, cover, or conduct any wire, cable, or appliance to conduct or handle electricity, any opening to outer air which is less than 26 inches if circular in shape, or less than 24 inches by 26 inches clear measurement if rectangular in shape.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8053.
